Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PRESERVING HISTORY OF HMONG VETERANS OF THE SECRET WAR IN LAOS.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Special Guerrilla Units Veterans and Families of USA, Inc. to collect, document, archive, and preserve the oral histories of Hmong veterans of the United States-sponsored Secret War in Laos and to create programming and educational resources to teach the public and future generations about the history, legacy, and cultural heritage of the Hmong in Minnesota. new text end